Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 1 General Provisions
63-1-139. Rules and regulations.

Each board, commission, committee, agency or other governmental entity created pursuant to this title, title 68, chapter 24, and title 68, chapter 140, part 3 shall notify each applicant for a license, certification or registration from such board, commission, committee, agency or other governmental entity where to obtain a copy of any statutes, rules, policies and guidelines setting forth the prerequisites for such license, certification or registration and shall, upon request, make available to the applicant a copy of such statutes, rules, policies and guidelines.

Each board, commission, committee, agency or other governmental entity created pursuant to this title, title 68, chapter 24 and title 68, chapter 140, part 3 shall notify each holder of a license, certification or registration from the board, commission, committee, agency or other governmental entity of changes in state law that impact the holder and are implemented or enforced by the entity, including newly promulgated or amended statutes, rules, policies and guidelines. The notification required by this subsection (b) may be satisfied by the board, commission, committee, agency, or other governmental entity posting on its website changes in state law that impact the holder and are implemented or enforced by the entity, including newly promulgated or amended statutes, rules, policies, and guidelines. The website posting must be made within thirty (30) days of the effective date of the change and maintained on the website until at least two (2) years after the effective date of the change.

Each board, commission, committee, agency or other governmental entity created pursuant to this title, title 68, chapter 24 and title 68, chapter 140, part 3 shall establish and maintain a link or links on the entity's website to the statutes, rules, policies and guidelines that are implemented or enforced by the entity and that impact an applicant for, or a holder of, a license, certification or registration from the entity.

Each board, commission, committee, agency or other governmental entity created pursuant to this title, title 68, chapter 24 and title 68, chapter 140, part 3 shall allow each holder of a license, certification or registration from the board, commission, committee, agency or other governmental entity to have the option of being notified by electronic mail of:

Renewals of the holder’s license, certification or registration;

Any fee increases;

[Deleted by 2020 amendment.]

Any meeting where changes in rules or fees are on the agenda. For purposes of this subdivision (d)(1)(D), the electronic notice shall be at least forty-five (45) days in advance of the meeting, unless it is an emergency meeting then the notice shall be sent as soon as is practicable.

Each board, commission, agency or other governmental entity created pursuant to this title, title 68, chapter 24 and title 68, chapter 140, part 3 shall notify each holder of a license, certification or registration of the availability of receiving electronic notices pursuant to subdivision (d)(1) upon issuance or renewal of the holder’s license, certification or registration.

Each board, commission, committee, agency or other governmental entity created pursuant to this title, title 68, chapter 24 and title 68, chapter 140, part 3 shall have the authority to accept license applications and renewals electronically as if the same were submitted in hard copy format.

Acts 1998, ch. 1088, § 2; 2008, ch. 1070, §§ 3-5; 2012, ch. 952, § 2; 2014, ch. 949, § 3; 2020, ch. 594, §§ 6-8.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 1070, § 13 provided that each entity subject to the act, which amended subsection (a) and added subsections (b) and (c), shall promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of the act. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment, in (b), deleted “, upon the issuance and upon each renewal of the holder's license, certification or registration” following “policies and guidelines” at the end of the first sentence and added the second and third sentences; and deleted (d)(1)(C), which read: “Any changes in state law that impact the holder and are implemented or enforced by the entity, including newly promulgated or amended statutes, rules, policies and guidelines; and”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 594, § 9. March 20, 2020.

63-1-140. State citizenship of all board members.

All members of any board, commission or council that licenses, certifies or regulates any profession or occupation shall, during the time of their respective appointments, be citizens of this state. The appointment of any member of any board, commission or council that licenses or certifies any profession or occupation shall terminate when Tennessee is no longer the domicile of such member.

Acts 1998, ch. 1088, § 4.

63-1-141. Default on student loans by members of the healing arts profession.

Upon receiving a copy of a final order as provided in subsection (b) from the Tennessee student assistance corporation (TSAC) or a guarantee agency that has an agreement with the United States secretary of education (guarantee agency), each board, commission, committee, agency or other governmental entity (licensing authority) created pursuant to this title shall suspend, deny or revoke the license of, or take other such appropriate disciplinary action, against any person (also referred to as the debtor), who has defaulted on a repayment or service obligation under any federal family education loan program, the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, a student loan guaranteed or administered by the Tennessee student assistance corporation or any other state or federal educational loan or service-conditional scholarship program.

Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(1), a licensing authority may elect not to suspend, deny, or revoke the license of a person if the default or delinquency is the result of a medical hardship that prevented the person from working in the person's licensed field and the medical hardship significantly contributed to the default or delinquency.

Each board, commission, committee, agency or other governmental entity created pursuant to this title shall accept any determination of default from TSAC or a guarantee agency, after TSAC or the guarantee agency has afforded a debtor an opportunity to be heard in accordance with subdivision (b)(2); and such board, commission, committee, agency or other governmental entity shall rescind any disciplinary action and restore any license or certificate upon receiving notice from such corporation or guarantee agency that the person has agreed to serve such person's obligation or is in compliance with an approved repayment plan.

Unless a debtor has made satisfactory arrangements according to the lender, TSAC or the guarantee agency, which may include administrative wage garnishment, voluntary payment arrangements or deferment/forbearance, then the debtor shall be regarded as delinquent or in default. If a debtor is delinquent or in default on a repayment or service obligation under a guaranteed student loan identified in subsection (a) or such debtor has failed to enter into a payment plan or comply with a payment plan previously approved by TSAC or the guarantee agency, then TSAC or the guarantee agency shall issue to such debtor a notice of intent to file an order with the appropriate licensing authority to suspend, deny or revoke the debtor's license or certificate. The notice must:

Be served upon the debtor personally or by certified mail with return receipt requested; and

State that the debtor's license or certificate will be suspended, denied or revoked ninety (90) days after service, unless within that time the debtor:

Pays the entire debt stated in the notice;

Enters into a payment plan or complies with a payment plan previously entered into and approved by TSAC or the guarantee agency; or

Requests a hearing before TSAC or the guarantee agency.

Any such hearing request by the debtor shall be made in writing and must be received by TSAC or the guarantee agency within twenty (20) days of the date the notice is served.

TSAC, or the guarantee agency, upon receipt of a request for a hearing from the debtor, shall schedule a hearing to determine whether suspension, denial or revocation of the debtor's license or certificate is appropriate. The debtor's license or certificate may not be suspended, denied or revoked until a determination is reached following the hearing. The only issues that may be determined in such hearing are:

The amount of the debt, if any;

Whether the debtor is delinquent or in default;

Whether the debtor has entered into a payment plan or the debtor is willing to enter into a payment plan or to comply with a payment plan previously entered into and approved by TSAC or the guarantee agency; and

Whether the debtor's default or delinquency is the result of a medical hardship that prevented the debtor from working in the debtor's licensed field and the medical hardship significantly contributed to the default or delinquency.

If a debtor fails to respond to such notice of intent, fails to timely request a hearing or fails to appear at a regularly scheduled hearing, the debtor's defenses, objections or request for a payment plan or compliance with a payment plan may be determined to be without merit, and TSAC or the guarantee agency shall enter a final decision and order, requesting suspension, denial or revocation of the debtor's license or certificate and further requesting the licensing authority to order the debtor to refrain from engaging in the licensed activity or activity for which a certificate has been issued. TSAC or the guarantee agency shall send a copy of such order to the licensing authority and the debtor.

All such administrative hearings shall be conducted in the same manner as those conducted pursuant to §§ 36-5-703 and 36-5-704.

When TSAC or the guarantee agency determines that the debt is paid in full or the debtor has entered into a payment plan or complied with a payment plan previously approved by TSAC or the guarantee agency, TSAC or the guarantee agency shall terminate the order suspending, denying or revoking the license or certificate. TSAC or the guarantee agency shall send a copy of the order terminating the suspension, denial or revocation to the licensing authority and the debtor. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, rule or regulation to the contrary, when the license or certificate is reinstated, the licensing authority shall not impose a reinstatement fee that exceeds fifty dollars ($50.00).

Entry of an order terminating suspension, denial or revocation of a license or certificate does not limit the ability of TSAC or the guarantee agency to issue a new order suspending, denying or revoking the license or certificate of the same debtor in the event of another delinquency or default.

TSAC is authorized to promulgate necessary rules and regulations in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, to implement this subsection (b).

Each board, commission, committee, agency or other governmental entity created pursuant to this title shall promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this section.

Acts 1999, ch. 476, § 1; 2018, ch. 744, §§ 11, 12.

Compiler's Notes. The federal Higher Education Act of 1965, referred to in this section, is compiled primarily at 20 U.S.C. § 1001 et seq.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, added (a)(2) and (b)(2)(C)(iv).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 744, § 13. January 1, 2019; provided that for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect April 18, 2018.

63-1-142. Temporary authorization to practice.

Any board regulated by this title may authorize any of its members or its designee to conduct a review of the qualifications of an applicant for a license to practice such profession in this state and to make an initial determination as to whether the applicant has met all the requirements for licensure. If the board member or board designee determines that the applicant has met all the requirements for a license, the board member or board designee has the authority to issue to such applicant a temporary authorization to practice, and, once the temporary authorization is issued, the applicant is then authorized to practice such profession in this state until the board makes a final decision on the application for a license. Such temporary authorization, once issued, shall be deemed to be a valid license for all purposes, granting to the applicant all rights that would attach if the person had been issued a permanent license at that time. The board may authorize the use of this procedure with respect to an applicant for an initial license, temporary permit, temporary license, renewal of license and license reinstatement if the issuance of temporary permits, temporary licenses, renewal of license and license reinstatement is otherwise authorized by such board's practice statutes. In no event shall the temporary authorization issued pursuant to an initial determination made by a board member or a board designee be effective for longer than a six-month period measured from the date of issuance. The applicant shall not utilize this process for the same reason more than once.

If temporary authorization, pursuant to subsection (a), is issued to an applicant and if the subsequent decision of the board is to deny the application based upon a determination that the applicant has not complied with all the requirements for licensure, then the initial approval from that point forward shall immediately become null and void, and the applicant shall be notified immediately. In this event, the doctrine of estoppel shall not apply against the state based upon its issuance of temporary authorization and its subsequent denial of licensure.

Acts 1999, ch. 518, § 1.

63-1-143. Notification of vacancy — Termination due to vacancy.

Each board, commission, committee, agency or other governmental entity created pursuant to this title incurring a vacancy shall notify the appointing authority in writing within ninety (90) days after the vacancy. All vacancies, other than ex officio members, on any board, commission, committee, agency or other governmental entity created pursuant to this title shall be filled by the appointing authority within ninety (90) days of receiving written notice of the vacancy and sufficient information is provided for the appointing authority to make an informed decision in regard to filling such vacancy. If sufficient information has been provided and a board, commission, committee, agency or other governmental entity created pursuant to this title has more than one (1) vacancy that is more than one hundred eighty (180) days in duration, such board, commissioner, committee, agency or other governmental entity shall report to the house and senate government operations committees why such vacancies have not been filled.

If more than one-half (½) of the positions on any board, commission, committee, agency or other governmental entity created pursuant to this title are vacant for more than one hundred eighty (180) consecutive days, such board, commission, committee, agency or other governmental entity shall terminate. Such board, commission, committee, agency or other governmental entity shall wind up its affairs pursuant to § 4-29-112. If a board, commission, committee, agency or other governmental entity created pursuant to this title is terminated pursuant to this subsection (b), it shall be reviewed by the evaluation committees pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled at title 4, chapter 5, before ceasing all its activities. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the general assembly from continuing, restructuring, or reestablishing a board, commission, committee, agency or other governmental entity created pursuant to this title.

Acts 2000, ch. 835, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2000, ch. 835, § 7 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall not change any procedure, manner, or time which members of the Tennessee motor vehicle commission who are selected from a list of qualified persons submitted by motor vehicle manufacturers licensed in Tennessee or their consumer replacements are appointed pursuant to § 55-17-103.

63-1-144. Payment of costs of investigation and prosecution.

In addition to any existing authority regarding the requirement to pay costs in disciplinary proceedings, when the division or any board, council or committee created pursuant to this title and/or title 68, chapters 24 and 29 and regulated under the authority of the department of health imposes sanctions on a license or certificate holder in any disciplinary contested case proceeding, the license or certificate holder may, at the discretion of the division, board, council or committee before which the contested case proceeding was held be required to pay the actual and reasonable costs of the investigation and prosecution of the case, which shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

All costs absorbed by the division or attributed to and assessed against the board, council or committee by the division's bureau of investigations in connection with the prosecution of the matter including all investigator time, travel and lodging incurred during the prosecution;

All costs absorbed by the division or assessed against the board, council or committee by the division for the use of the division facilities and personnel for prosecution of the matter;

All costs assessed against the division, board, council or committee for the appearance fees, transcripts, time, travel and lodging of administrative law judges and court reporters and witnesses required in the prosecution of the matter; and

All costs attributed to and assessed against the division, board, council or committee by the department's office of general counsel in connection with the prosecution of the matter, including all attorney and paralegal time, travel and lodging incurred during the prosecution of the matter.

The division, board or committee shall include in any order in which the payment of costs has been assessed an amount that is the maximum amount owed by the license or certificate holder at the time the order is entered. Prior to the expiration of sixty (60) days from the effective date of the order, the division, council, board or committee shall send to the license or certificate holder, by certified mail, return receipt requested, and by regular United States mail, a final costs assessment that does not exceed the maximum amount in the order.

Acts 2003, ch. 102, § 1; 2007, ch. 265, § 1.

63-1-145. Rules and regulations regarding advertisement pertaining to board certification and specialty.

Consistent with this title, the boards of the respective branches of the healing arts shall promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, and this title to regulate the nature, manner, content and extent of advertising and the use of titles by practitioners of such healing arts who are under the jurisdiction of such boards, including advertising pertaining to board certification and specialty. Those boards that have already adopted such rules and regulations are not required to adopt additional rules and regulations, unless and until deemed necessary and appropriate by those boards.

Acts 2005, ch. 467, § 4.

63-1-146. Rules and regulations regarding sanctions for violations.

Consistent with this title, the boards of the respective branches of the healing arts are hereby authorized to promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, which establish sanctions for violations of this chapter by members of the professions the boards regulate. Such sanctions may include civil penalties, suspension or revocation of license.

Acts 2005, ch. 467, § 5.

63-1-147. Authority to enter into arrangements for evaluating and guiding the development of the health care workforce to improve delivery of quality health care.

Any board of an allied health care profession, for allied health professionals as defined by United States Code, title 42, chapter 6A, subchapter V, part F, § 295p (42 U.S.C. § 295p), within the division of health related boards as set out in § 68-1-101, is authorized to enter into grants, agreements, scholarships or other arrangements with statewide nonprofit agencies or other state agencies for the purpose of evaluating and guiding the development of the education, distribution and availability of the allied health care workforce under the regulation of that board to provide a basis for improving the delivery of quality health care.

Acts 2006, ch. 558, § 1.

63-1-148. Covenants not to compete signed by healthcare providers.

A restriction on the right of an employed or contracted healthcare provider to practice the healthcare provider's profession upon termination or conclusion of the employment or contractual relationship shall be deemed reasonable if:

The restriction is set forth in an employment agreement or other written document signed by the healthcare provider and the employing or contracting entity; and

The duration of the restriction is two (2) years or less and either:

The maximum allowable geographic restriction is the greater of:

A ten-mile radius from the primary practice site of the healthcare provider while employed or contracted; or

The county in which the primary practice of the healthcare provider while employed or contracted is located; or

There is no geographic restriction, but the healthcare provider is restricted from practicing the healthcare provider's profession at any facility at which the employing or contracting entity provided services while the healthcare provider was employed or contracted with the employing or contracting entity.

An agreement entered into in conjunction with the purchase or sale of a healthcare provider's practice, or all or substantially all of the assets of the healthcare provider's practice, may restrict the healthcare provider's right to practice the healthcare provider's profession; provided, that the duration of the restriction and the allowable area of the restriction are reasonable under the circumstances. There shall be a rebuttable presumption that the duration and area of restriction agreed upon by the parties in such an agreement are reasonable.

This section shall apply to healthcare providers licensed under chapters 3, 4, 5, 6, 8, 9 and 11 of this title.

This section shall not apply to physicians who specialize in the practice of emergency medicine.

Acts 2007, ch. 487, § 1; 2008, ch. 891, § 1; 2010, ch. 851, § 1; 2011, ch. 218, §§ 1, 2.

Law Reviews.

Covenants Not to Compete: The Real Question for Enforcement, 47 U. Mem. L. Rev. 855 (2017).

Physician Non-Compete Agreements Revisited and Revived (Josh A. McCreary), 43 Tenn. B.J. 17 (2007).

Tax Subsidies, Third-Party-Payments, and Cross-Subsidization: America's Distorted Health Care Markets (William P. Kratzke), 40 U. Mem. L. Rev. 279 (2009).

63-1-149. Registry check.

On and after October 1, 2010, before employing or contracting with any person who would be providing direct patient care, for whom a background check has not been completed, a health care professional licensed under any chapter of this title or title 68, chapters 24 and 140, shall initiate and perform a “registry check” which for the purposes of this section is defined as:

A state-by-state look in any state in which the person has lived in the previous seven (7) years of the national sex offender public registry website coordinated by the United States department of justice, including, but not limited to, the sexual offender registry maintained by the Tennessee bureau of investigation pursuant to title 40, chapter 39, part 2; and

Any adult abuse registry maintained for any state in which the person has lived in the previous seven (7) years; and

The department of health's elder abuse registry established pursuant to title 68, chapter 11, part 10.

Should an applicant be listed on any of the registries listed in subdivisions (a)(1)-(3), the health care professional shall not employ or contract with the person if the person would be providing direct patient care.

A health care professional who complies with the requirements to perform registry checks under subsection (a), or relies on a documented representation provided by an entity with which the health care professional contracts that the person who will work in the office is not on any of these registries, shall not be subject to civil or criminal liability solely based upon the information provided through a registry check under this section. This immunity shall extend to a claim related to the professional's refusal to employ or contract with a person based on information obtained from a registry check.

This section is not intended to apply to contracted, external staff who provide such services as cleaning services, maintenance of office or medical equipment or other services where direct patient contact is not intended.

This section shall not apply to health care professionals licensed chapter 12 of this title.

The department of health shall post no later than October 1, 2010, in a conspicuous location on its website as well as the website of each applicable licensing board a link to all potential databases the health care professional would be required to check pursuant to subsection (a). In addition, each applicable licensing board shall notify all of its licensees at least annually through board newsletters of their obligations under this section.

Acts 2010, ch. 1084, § 1.

63-1-150. Patient safety and quality improvement.

This section shall not apply to §§ 63-4-118, 63-5-131, 63-10-402 — 63-10-405, 63-11-220, 63-12-138 and 68-11-272.

It is the policy of this state to encourage the improvement of patient safety and quality and the evaluation of the quality, safety, cost, processes and necessity of healthcare services by healthcare providers and by other entities. This state further recognizes that certain protections must be available to these providers and entities to ensure that they are able to effectively pursue these measures.

As used in this section:

“Healthcare organization” means any:

State or local health professional association or society;

Professional assistance program providing, or attempting to provide, intervention, counseling, referral or other assistance to any healthcare provider or family of a healthcare provider directly related to and including the alcohol or drug impairment of a healthcare provider;

Healthcare provider malpractice support group;

Group practice that is engaged in the provision of healthcare services;

Entity engaged in the provision of healthcare provider services or healthcare provider staffing to licensed healthcare entities, including hospitals;

Professional healthcare foundation;

Individual practice association made up of practices the members of which are engaged in the provision of health care;

Health maintenance organization, preferred provider organization, hospital and medical service corporation, or accountable care organization as defined by § 3022 of the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, P.L. 111-148, as amended;

Entity that contracts with a healthcare organization to perform any of the functions of a quality improvement committee;

Any patient safety organization listed as such by the federal secretary of health and human services pursuant to § 924 of the Patient Safety and Quality Improvement Act of 2005, P.L. 109-41, as amended;

University medical school or health science center; or

Community mental health center as defined in § 33-1-101;

“Healthcare provider” means any healthcare professional licensed, authorized, certified or regulated under this title, including, but not limited to, medical resident physicians, interns, and fellows participating in a training program of one (1) of the accredited medical schools or of one (1) of such medical school's affiliated teaching hospitals in this state, or any other clinical staff of a healthcare organization;

“Quality improvement committee” or “QIC” means a committee formed or retained by a healthcare organization, an activity of a healthcare organization, or one (1) or more individuals employed by a healthcare organization performing the types of functions listed in subdivisions (c)(3)(A)-(P), the purpose of which, or one (1) of the purposes of which is to evaluate the safety, quality, processes, costs, appropriateness, or necessity of healthcare services by performing functions, including, but not limited to:

Evaluation and improvement of the quality of healthcare services rendered;

Determination that health services rendered were professionally indicated or were performed in compliance with applicable standards of care;

Determination that the cost of health care rendered was considered reasonable;

Evaluation of the qualifications, credentials, competence and performance of healthcare providers or action upon matters relating to the discipline of any individual healthcare provider;

Reduction of morbidity or mortality;

Establishment and enforcement of guidelines designed to keep the cost of health care within reasonable bounds;

Research;

Evaluation of whether facilities are being properly utilized;

Supervision, education, discipline, admission, and the determination of privileges of healthcare providers;

Review of professional qualifications or activities of healthcare providers;

Evaluation of the quantity, quality and timeliness of healthcare services rendered to patients;

Evaluation, review or improvement of methods, procedures or treatments being utilized;

Intervention, support or rehabilitative referrals or services to healthcare providers;

Evaluation as to whether to report an unusual incident pursuant to § 63-6-221 or § 63-9-117 or to evaluate and improve the quality of health care rendered by healthcare providers related to the submission of an unusual incident report;

Activities to determine the healthcare organization's compliance with state or federal regulations; or

Participation in utilization review activities, including participation in review activities within the healthcare organization and activities in conjunction with an insurer or utilization review agent under title 56, chapter 6, part 7; and

“Records” means records of interviews and all reports, incident reports, statements, minutes, memoranda, charts, statistics, evaluations, critiques, test results, corrective actions, disciplinary actions and any and all other documentation generated in connection with the activities of a QIC.

Records of a QIC and testimony or statements by a healthcare organization's officers or directors, trustees, healthcare providers, administrative staff, employees or other committee members or attendees relating to activities of the QIC shall be confidential and privileged and shall be protected from direct or indirect means of discovery, subpoena or admission into evidence in any judicial or administrative proceeding. Any person who supplies information, testifies or makes statements as part of a QIC may not be required to provide information as to the information, testimony or statements provided to or made before such a committee or opinions formed by such person as a result of committee participation.

Any information, documents or records, which are not produced for use by a QIC or which are not produced by persons acting on behalf of a QIC, and are otherwise available from original sources, shall not be construed as immune from discovery or use in any judicial or administrative proceedings merely because such information, documents or records were presented during proceedings of such committee.

A QIC may share information and documents, including complaints, incident reports, and testimony and statements by any person to the QIC, with one (1) or more other QICs as defined under this section or under § 68-11-272. Information and documents disclosed by one (1) QIC to another QIC, and any information and documents created or maintained as a result of the sharing of such information and documents, shall be confidential, privileged and protected from direct or indirect means of discovery, subpoena or admission into evidence, to the same extent as provided in subdivision (d)(1). The QIC sharing such information with another QIC shall determine the manner and process by which it will share such information and documents, which process may include requiring a written agreement between QICs regarding the sharing of practitioner information. The QIC and its sponsoring healthcare organization shall not be held liable and are immune from suit for any disclosure or sharing of information in compliance with this section.

No healthcare organization or its officers, trustees, directors, healthcare providers, administrative staff, employees, other committee members or attendees, or any person providing information to a QIC shall be held liable:

In any action for damages or other relief and is immune from liability arising from the provision of information to a QIC or in any judicial or administrative proceeding if the information is provided to the QIC in good faith and without malice and on the basis of facts reasonably known or reasonably believed to exist; or

In any action for damages or other relief and is immune from liability resulting from any decisions, opinions, actions, and proceedings rendered, entered or acted upon by a QIC undertaken or performed within the scope or function of the duties of such committees or in any judicial or administrative proceeding, if made or taken in good faith and without malice and on the basis of facts reasonably known or reasonably believed to exist.

A professional assistance program also advocates for healthcare professionals before other QICs, healthcare entities, private and governmental insurance carriers, national or local certification and accreditation bodies, and the state health-related boards of this or any other state. The disclosure of confidential, privileged QIC information to such entities during advocacy or as a report to the health-related boards, or to the affected healthcare provider under review, does not constitute either a waiver of confidentiality or privilege.

Any person providing information to a QIC is presumed to have acted in good faith and without malice. Any person alleging lack of good faith has the burden of proving bad faith and malice.

All decisions, opinions, actions and proceedings rendered, entered or acted upon by a QIC are presumed to have been completed in good faith and without malice. Any person alleging lack of good faith has the burden of proving bad faith and malice.

Acts 2011, ch. 67, § 4; 2014, ch. 651, §§ 1-3; 2017, ch. 4, § 1; 2018, ch. 593, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 67, § 2 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Patient Safety and Quality Improvement Act of 2011.”

Amendments. The 2017 amendment deleted “63-9-114,” following “63-5-131,” in (a).

The 2018 amendment added (c)(1)(L).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 4, § 11. March 15, 2017.

Acts 2018, ch. 593, § 3. March 22, 2018.

63-1-151. Report by practitioner to licensing board of indictment for offense involving sale or dispensing of controlled substances.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter or of chapter 3, chapters 5-9 or chapter 19 of this title, when a practitioner licensed under any of such chapters is under state or federal indictment in this state for an offense involving the sale or dispensing of controlled substances under state or federal law, the practitioner shall report the indictment to the practitioner's licensing board in writing within seven (7) calendar days of acquiring actual knowledge of the indictment. Such report shall include the jurisdiction in which the indictment is pending, if known, and shall also be accompanied by a copy of the indictment, if the practitioner has one.

A district attorney general and appropriate attorneys for the federal government are strongly encouraged, when appropriate, to promptly notify a practitioner's licensing board when a practitioner covered under subdivision (a)(1) is indicted in this state for an offense involving the sale or dispensing of controlled substances under state or federal law.

The knowing failure of a practitioner to submit the report required in subdivision (a)(1) to the licensing board shall be considered unprofessional, dishonorable or unethical conduct and may be grounds for such licensing board to take disciplinary action against the practitioner's license. The fact an indictment was sealed and the practitioner could not have actual knowledge of its existence excuses the practitioner from discipline based on the failure of the practitioner to submit a report. However, the claim that the practitioner was not aware of the obligation required in subdivision (a)(1) may not excuse the practitioner from discipline based on the failure of the practitioner to submit a report.

Upon receiving a report of an indictment pursuant to subdivision (a)(1), (a)(2) or from any other source, the practitioner's licensing board, through the board's consultant or other person designated by the board, shall within fifteen (15) calendar days, conduct an expedited review of the practitioner's conduct alleged in the indictment. The purpose of such expedited review shall be to determine if the matter merits an expedited investigation by the board. If so, such a directive shall be given to the department of health's office of investigations. All review activity under this subsection (c) shall be confidential pursuant to § 63-1-117(f).

For the purposes of this section, “controlled substances” means substances regulated as controlled substances under title 39, chapter 17, part 4, or title 53, chapters 10 and 11, or the federal Controlled Substances Act, (21 U.S.C. § 801, et seq.).

Acts 2013, ch. 232, § 1.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.